Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-5243
Index rate, defined.

Index rate shall mean, for each class of business as to a rating period for small employers with similar case characteristics, the arithmetic average of the applicable base premium rate and the corresponding highest premium rate.

Laws 1994, LB 1222, § 21.